North Carolina, session 2025, HB1081.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Program Established. – Within the funds made available pursuant to
Section 2 of this act, HBOT 4 HEROES, a nonprofit corporation, shall provide hyperbaric oxygen
therapy to eligible veterans who are residents of North Carolina and have a diagnosis of traumatic
brain injury (TBI) or posttraumatic stress disorder (PTSD) at no cost to the veteran. Treatment
shall be delivered through a structured program that includes clinical intake, treatment delivery,
and pre- and post-treatment outcome assessments. Hyperbaric oxygen therapy treatment
provided to a veteran pursuant to this section shall be provided in accordance with Part 5 of
Article 6 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes.
SECTION 2. Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental
Disabilities, and Substance Use Services (DMH/DD/SUS), the sum of three million dollars
($3,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to
HBOT 4 HEROES to provide an estimated 15,000 hyperbaric oxygen treatments, serving
approximately 350 veterans in accordance with this act. These funds shall be used solely for
direct treatment services, program administration, and required reporting. The funds appropriated
by this section shall not revert but shall remain available until expended.
*H1081-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. Report. – By June 30, 2027, HBOT 4 HEROES shall submit a report
to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal
Research Division on the provision of hyperbaric oxygen therapy treatment to veterans, including
the number of veterans served, the counties of residence of those veterans, aggregate outcomes,
and an accounting of State funds.
SECTION 4. Effective Date. – This act is effective July 1, 2026.
Page 2 House Bill 1081-First Edition